Utah statutes.
23-16-1.1.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Cultivated crops" means:
(a)  crops from or on cleared and planted land; and
(b)  crop residues that have forage value for livestock.
(2)  "Depredation mitigation plan" means the plan described in Subsection
23-16-3(2).
(3)  "Mitigation review panel" means the panel created under Section
23-16-3.2.
